Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-2402
Charter; grant; when.

The Department of Banking and Finance may grant a charter to transact the business of a credit card bank if the Director of Banking and Finance is satisfied that the applicant has met the conditions set forth in section 8-2401 and the Nebraska Banking Act as to the formation of a new bank.

Laws 2004, LB 999, § 18.

Nebraska Banking Act, see section 8-101.02.